test/src/morphology/N-suoloj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - suoloj: # -kontrakta utan stv
    suoloj+N+Sg+Nom: [suoloj, sullu]
    suoloj+N+Sg+Gen: sullu
    suoloj+N+Sg+Acc: sulluv
    suoloj+N+Sg+Ill: sulluj
    suoloj+N+Sg+Ine: sullun
    suoloj+N+Sg+Ela: sullust
    suoloj+N+Sg+Com: sullujn
    suoloj+N+Pl+Nom: sullu
    suoloj+N+Pl+Gen: sulluj
    suoloj+N+Pl+Acc: sullujt
    suoloj+N+Pl+Ill: sullujda
    suoloj+N+Pl+Ine: sullujn
    suoloj+N+Pl+Ela: sullujst
    suoloj+N+Pl+Com: sulluj
    suoloj+N+Ess: sullun
    suoloj+N+Abe: sulludak
